Missouri, session 2026, SB1625.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 590.145, 595.045, 650.277, and
701.377, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 590.145, 595.045, 650.277,
and 701.377, to read as follows:
590.145. All moneys received by the Missouri state
highway patrol for the training of peace officers who are
not members of the state highway patrol shall be deposited
in the state treasury to the credit of the "Highway Patrol
Academy Fund" which is hereby created. [Subject to section
33.080,] Balances from this fund shall be made available for
the repair, maintenance, operation, and personal services
required to operate the patrol academy and for no other
purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, moneys in the fund at the end of any
biennium shall not be transferred to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
595.045. 1. There is established in the state
treasury the "Crime Victims' Compensation Fund". A
surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1625 2
as costs in each court proceeding filed in any court in the
state in all criminal cases including violations of any
county ordinance or any violation of criminal or traffic
laws of the state, including an infraction and violation of
a municipal ordinance; except that no such fee shall be
collected in any proceeding in any court when the proceeding
or the defendant has been dismissed by the court or when
costs are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality.
A surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be
assessed as costs in a juvenile court proceeding in which a
child is found by the court to come within the applicable
provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the moneys collected by clerks of the courts
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall be collected and disbursed in accordance with sections
488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable to the director of
the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the
amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state
forensic laboratory account administered by the department
of public safety to provide financial assistance to defray
expenses of crime laboratories if such analytical
laboratories are registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Agency or the Missouri department of health and
senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public
safety to the crime laboratories serving the courts of this
state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis
of blood, breath or urine in relation to a court
proceeding. Notwithstanding the provisions of section

SB 1625 3
33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the fund at the end of any
biennium shall not be transferred to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of
this section shall be denoted to the payment of an annual
appropriation for the administrative and operational costs
of the office for victims of crime and, if a statewide
automated crime victim notification system is established
pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of
expenditures actually incurred in the operation of such
system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first
of each month, the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee
shall at least monthly report the moneys paid pursuant to
this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and
the services to victims fund to the department of public
safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be collected
and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020.

SB 1625 4
Five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city
treasury of the city from which such funds were collected.
The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be
payable to the director of revenue. The funds received by
the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first
of each month the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by
the Missouri state auditor. Such audit shall include all
records associated with crime victims' compensation funds
collected, held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section, the court shall enter a
judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the
crime victims' compensation fund, of sixty-eight dollars
upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for a class A or
B felony; forty-six dollars upon a plea of guilty or finding
of guilt for a class C, D, or E felony; and ten dollars upon
a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for any misdemeanor
under Missouri law except for those in chapter 252 relating
to fish and game, chapter 302 relating to drivers' and

SB 1625 5
100 commercial drivers' license, chapter 303 relating to motor
101 vehicle financial responsibility, chapter 304 relating to
102 traffic regulations, chapter 306 relating to watercraft
103 regulation and licensing, and chapter 307 relating to
104 vehicle equipment regulations. Any clerk of the court
105 receiving moneys pursuant to such judgments shall collect
106 and disburse such crime victims' compensation judgments in
107 the manner provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Such
108 funds shall be payable to the state treasury and deposited
109 to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund.
110 9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall
111 maintain records of all dispositions described in subsection
112 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment has
113 been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of
114 Missouri in accordance with this section; all payments made
115 on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
116 judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not
117 collected. These records shall be subject to audit by the
118 state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such
119 funds shall report separately the amount of dollars
120 collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
121 offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections
122 or services to victims collections.
123 10. The department of revenue shall maintain records
124 of funds transmitted to the crime victims' compensation fund
125 by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
126 subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate
127 records of collection for alcohol-related offenses.
128 11. The state courts administrator shall include in
129 the annual report required by section 476.350 the circuit
130 court caseloads and the number of crime victims'
131 compensation judgments entered.

SB 1625 6
132 12. All awards made to injured victims under sections
133 595.010 to 595.105 and all appropriations for administration
134 of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except sections 595.050 and
135 595.055, shall be made from the crime victims' compensation
136 fund. Any unexpended balance remaining in the crime
137 victims' compensation fund at the end of each biennium shall
138 not be subject to the provision of section 33.080 requiring
139 the transfer of such unexpended balance to the ordinary
140 revenue fund of the state, but shall remain in the crime
141 victims' compensation fund. In the event that there are
142 insufficient funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
143 to pay all claims in full, all claims shall be paid on a pro
144 rata basis. If there are no funds in the crime victims'
145 compensation fund, then no claim shall be paid until funds
146 have again accumulated in the crime victims' compensation
147 fund. When sufficient funds become available from the fund,
148 awards which have not been paid shall be paid in
149 chronological order with the oldest paid first. In the
150 event an award was to be paid in installments and some
151 remaining installments have not been paid due to a lack of
152 funds, then when funds do become available that award shall
153 be paid in full. All such awards on which installments
154 remain due shall be paid in full in chronological order
155 before any other postdated award shall be paid. Any award
156 pursuant to this subsection is specifically not a claim
157 against the state, if it cannot be paid due to a lack of
158 funds in the crime victims' compensation fund.
159 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as
160 provided in this section and such sum, or any part thereof,
161 remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any
162 disbursement, payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or
163 other transfer of money from the state of Missouri to such

SB 1625 7
164 defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such
165 judgment. Such amount shall be paid forthwith to the crime
166 victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such judgment
167 shall be entered on the court record. Under no
168 circumstances shall the general revenue fund be used to
169 reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The
170 director of the department of corrections shall have the
171 authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation fund
172 from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed
173 by the offender to the crime victims' compensation fund,
174 provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount owed
175 to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the
176 department of corrections.
177 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds
178 in the crime victims' compensation fund shall be paid into
179 the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
180 general revenue of this state.
181 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim
182 or false statement in connection with any claim hereunder is
183 guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
184 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions
185 for the benefit of crime victims. Such gifts and
186 contributions shall be credited to the crime victims'
187 compensation fund as used solely for compensating victims
188 under the provisions of sections 595.010 to 595.075.
650.277. 1. As otherwise provided by sections 650.200
to 650.295, the boiler and pressure vessel board shall set
fees for inspection, permits, licenses, and certificates
required by sections 650.200 to 650.295. Fees shall be
determined by the board to provide sufficient funds for the
operation of the board and shall be set by rule or
regulation promulgated in accordance with the provisions of

SB 1625 8
section 536.021. The board may alter the fee schedule once
every two years. Any funds collected pursuant to sections
650.200 to 650.295 shall be deposited in the "Boiler and
Pressure Vessels Safety Fund", which is hereby created.
Beginning July 1, 2003, moneys in the fund shall be
appropriated from the fund for the expenses of the board. A
municipality or other political subdivision enforcing the
provisions of sections 650.200 to 650.295 and which performs
the inspections, permitting, licensing, and certification as
required, the fee for such inspection shall be paid directly
to the municipality or political subdivision and shall not
be preempted by sections 650.200 to 650.295, except that any
fee established by the board for the issuance of appropriate
state certificates shall be paid to the board.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, moneys in the boiler and pressure vessels safety
fund at the end of any biennium shall not be transferred to
the credit of the general revenue fund.
2. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section or under the authority
of sections 650.210 to 650.275 shall become effective only
if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be invalid and void.
701.377. As otherwise provided by sections 701.350 to
701.380, the elevator safety board shall set fees for

SB 1625 9
inspection, administration, permits, licenses, certificates,
and plan review required by the provisions of sections
701.350 to 701.380. Fees shall be determined by the elevator
safety board to provide sufficient funds for the operation
of the board, except that no fee for the certificate shall
exceed twenty-five dollars. The elevator safety board may
alter the fee schedule once each year. Any funds collected
pursuant to sections 701.350 to 701.380 and sections 316.200
to 316.237 shall be deposited in the "Elevator Safety Fund"
which is hereby created. Moneys shall be appropriated from
the fund for the expense and functions of the elevator
safety and amusement ride safety boards. [Any unexpended
funds in the elevator safety fund at the close of the
biennium shall revert to the general revenue as required by
section 33.080.] Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the elevator safety fund
at the end of any biennium shall not be transferred to the
credit of the general revenue fund. A municipality or other
political subdivision enforcing the provisions of sections
701.350 to 701.380 under the provisions of subsection 2 of
section 701.365 and which performs the plan review,
permitting, inspections, and certifications as required, the
fee for that inspection shall be paid directly to the
municipality or political subdivision and shall not be
preempted by sections 701.350 to 701.380, except that any
fee established by the elevator safety board for the
issuance of appropriate state certificates shall be paid to
the elevator safety board.
✓